District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.13

Powers and duties of the Mayor.

(a)

To ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter and of any rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter, the Mayor, or any duly authorized designee, shall be permitted at reasonable times to conduct an inspection of any agency, vehicle, or training facility, or to conduct a competency evaluation of any person, licensed or certified pursuant to this chapter or for which a licensure or certification application has been filed.

(b)

In the alternative or in addition to conducting an inspection or evaluation, the Mayor, or any duly authorized designee, shall be permitted to demand the production of all records relating to the operation of any agency, vehicle, or training facility, or to the performance of duties by any person, licensed or certified pursuant to this chapter or for which a licensure or certification application has been filed.

(c)

To ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter and of any rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter, the Mayor may conduct investigations, as needed, and may administer oaths, examine witnesses, and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of books, records, or other documents. In case of contempt or refusal to obey a subpoena, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, at the request of the Mayor, shall issue an order requiring the person to appear and testify or to produce books, papers, or other evidence bearing on the investigation. Failure to obey the court’s order shall be punishable as contempt of court.

(d)

The Mayor shall maintain and make available to the public information concerning:

(1)

Application, licensure, and renewal requirements and procedures;

(2)

An official register of licensed or certified emergency medical services agencies and emergency medical services training facilities; and

(3)

Trauma and emergency care data as required by this chapter and by rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

History

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 14, 56 DCR 1167